test/src/gt-norm-yamls/VAI_VLONG_IMP_boodawe_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfs
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  VAI - VLONG - boodawe - IMP :

  #Template Key
  #1
  #imperative

     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     boodawe+VAI+Imp+Del+2: boodawekan
     boodawe+VAI+Imp+Del+2+Pl: boodawekag
     boodawe+VAI+Imp+Imm+2: boodawen
     boodawe+VAI+Imp+Imm+2+1+Pl: boodawedaa
     boodawe+VAI+Imp+Imm+2+Pl: boodaweg
     boodawe+VAI+Imp+Proh+2: boodaweken
     boodawe+VAI+Imp+Proh+2+1+Pl: boodawesiidaa
     boodawe+VAI+Imp+Proh+2+Pl: boodawekegon
     
